South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3583.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-355.  (A)  The minimum hourly wage that a public school district may pay support staff is ten dollars per hour for a first-year employee, increased for employees with greater experience by ten percent for each additional year of service. However, if the federal minimum wage is greater than ten dollars an hour, then the minimum hourly wage that a public school district may pay support staff must be forty percent above the federal minimum wage for a first-year employee, increased by ten percent for each additional year of service. For purposes of determining the total years of service of an employee applicable to this wage scale, his years of employment in any school district in this State count toward the total years of his service. (B)  The State Department of Education shall prepare and publish salary schedules for the graduated minimum wage schedule provided in subsection (A) before July first annually or, if the federal minimum wage increases above ten dollars per hour, within thirty days after the effective date of the federal increase. (C)  Notwithstanding another provision of law, redress for a violation of this section must be determined under the provisions of Section 41-10-80. SECTION 2.  The provisions of this act take effect July 1, 2026. ----XX----